North Carolina, session 2025, HB957.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. JOINT LEGISLATIVE STUDY COMMITTEE ON INFRASTRUCTURE AT
HISTORICALLY BLACK COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES
SECTION 1.(a) There is created the Joint Legislative Study Committee (Committee)
on Infrastructure at Historically Black Colleges and Universities (HBCUs).
SECTION 1.(b) The Committee shall consist of nine members of the Senate
appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and nine members of the House of
Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The President Pro
Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each appoint a
cochair of the Committee from among its membership. These appointments shall be made no
later than September 1, 2025.
It is expected that the makeup of the Committee reflect geographic and urban/rural
diversity. At least one member of the House of Representatives and at least one member of the
Senate shall be from the minority party of their respective chambers.
SECTION 1.(c) In consultation with the Board of Governors of The University of
North Carolina and the president or equivalent officer of each HBCU in this State, the Committee
shall study all of the following related to buildings on HBCU campuses in the State:
(1) Threats posed to HBCUs by the proximity of certain facilities to toxic sites.
(2) Vulnerability of facilities to natural disasters and environmental risks.
(3) Age of facilities.
(4) Student enrollment in relation to classroom capacity.
(5) The condition of major systems, including heating, ventilation, air
conditioning, electrical, water, and sewer.
(6) The condition of exterior components of facilities, including roofing,
windows, and doors.
(7) Critical health of and other safety conditions of campus buildings.
(8) Facilities in significant disrepair and any deferred maintenance on those
facilities.
*H957-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(9) Any other issue the Committee considers relevant.
SECTION 1.(d) The Committee shall meet upon the call of its cochairs. A quorum
of the Committee is a majority of its members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote
at a meeting at which a quorum is present. The Committee, while in the discharge of its official
duties, may exercise all powers provided for under G.S. 120-19 and G.S. 120-19.1 through
G.S. 120-19.4. The Committee may contract for professional, clerical, or consultant services, as
provided by G.S. 120-32.02. If the Committee hires a consultant, the consultant shall not be a
State employee or a person currently under contract with the State to provide services. Members
of the Committee shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel allowance as provided in
G.S. 120-3.1. The expenses of the Committee shall be considered expenses incurred for the joint
operation of the General Assembly.
SECTION 1.(e) The Legislative Services Officer shall assign professional and
clerical staff to assist the Committee in its work. The Director of Legislative Assistants of the
House of Representatives and the Director of Legislative Assistants of the Senate shall assign
clerical support to the Committee.
SECTION 1.(f) Meetings of the Committee shall begin no later than August 15,
2025. The Committee shall submit a final report on the results of its study and development,
including proposed legislation, to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on or
before January 1, 2026, by filing a copy of the report with the Office of the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate, the Office of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee, and the Legislative Library. The Committee shall terminate on
January 1, 2026, or upon the filing of its final report, whichever comes first.

PART II. PERMANENT COMPLETION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
SECTION 2.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding the following new section to read:
"§ 116-44.9. Completion Assistance Programs.
(a) Definition. – For purposes of this section, the term "eligible constituent institutions"
refers to the following constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina:
(1) Elizabeth City State University.
(2) North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University.
(3) The University of North Carolina at Asheville.
(4) The University of North Carolina at Greensboro.
(5) The University of North Carolina at Pembroke.
(6) Winston-Salem State University.
(b) Program. – To the extent funds are provided for this purpose, the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina shall establish a Completion Assistance Program (Program)
at each eligible constituent institution. At a minimum, each Program shall meet the following
criteria:
(1) A student enrolled in a Program established by this section may receive up to
one thousand dollars ($1,000) per academic year under that Program to pay
for the costs of continuing attendance and earning necessary credit hours at
the eligible constituent institution.
(2) A student shall be eligible to receive funds under a Program if the student
meets at least the following requirements:
a. Needs financial assistance to remain enrolled at the eligible constituent
institution and earn credits necessary to graduate on time.
b. Is a resident for tuition purposes, as provided in G.S. 116-143.1.
c. Meets satisfactory academic progress, as determined by the Board.
d. Has completed or is on track to complete at least 60 academic credit
hours by the end of the semester in which the funds are provided.
Page 2 House Bill 957-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
e. Has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA)
for the academic year in which the funds are provided.
f. Has an unpaid balance with the eligible constituent institution. This
may include an unpaid balance for tuition, fees, room, board, or other
expenses of attendance.
(c) Report. – The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall report
on each Completion Assistance Program established pursuant to this section to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later than March 15 of each year. The report shall
include, at a minimum, an analysis of the impact of each Program on the following:
(1) On-time graduation rates.
(2) Student debt at graduation.
(d) Allocation of Funds. – The Board shall allocate funds provided for the Program to
each eligible constituent institution of The University of North Carolina proportional to the
number of undergraduate students enrolled at each eligible constituent institution who are
residents of North Carolina and recipients of a federal Pell Grant."
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the Escheat Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in
recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the Completion Assistance Programs
established pursuant to G.S. 116-44.9, as enacted by this section.

PART III. INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS FOR CERTAIN HISTORICALLY
BLACK COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the following sums in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026
fiscal year:
(1) To be allocated to Winston-Salem State University:
a. Five million one hundred thousand dollars ($5,100,000) for
renovations to Hauser Hall.
b. Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
emergency steam room repairs.
c. Two million dollars ($2,000,000) to repair and replace the
campus-wide steam distribution system.
(2) To be allocated to Elizabeth City State University:
a. Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for a sky bridge.
b. Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for a campus-wide
lockdown system.
c. Two million two hundred forty thousand dollars ($2,240,000) for
emergency generator power.

PART IV. NURSING FELLOWS PILOT PROGRAM AT WINSTON-SALEM STATE
UNIVERSITY
SECTION 4.(a) Article 23 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding the following new Part to read:
"Part 3A. North Carolina Nursing Fellows Program.
"§ 116-209.64. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Commission. – The North Carolina Nursing Fellows Commission.
(2) Director. – The Director of the North Carolina Nursing Fellows Program.
(3) Eligible nursing program. – Any educational program in North Carolina
leading to a bachelor of science in nursing that is offered by Winston-Salem
State University and meant to prepare a person to meet the educational
House Bill 957-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
requirements for licensure under Article 9A of Chapter 90 of the General
Statutes.
(4) Forgivable loan. – A forgivable loan made under the Program.
(5) Program. – The North Carolina Nursing Fellows Program.
(6) Qualifying nurse. – A nurse who meets the following criteria:
a. Received a forgivable loan.
b. Graduated within 10 years from an eligible nursing program,
excluding any authorized deferment for extenuating circumstances.
c. Is licensed and employed as a registered nurse in this State.
(7) Trust Fund. – The North Carolina Nursing Fellows Program Trust Fund.
"§ 116-209.65. North Carolina Nursing Fellows Commission established; membership.
(a) Commission Established. – There is established the North Carolina Nursing Fellows
Commission. The Commission shall determine program and forgivable loan recipient selection
criteria and selection procedures and shall select the recipients to receive forgivable loans under
the North Carolina Nursing Fellows Program in accordance with the requirements of this Part.
The Director of the North Carolina Nursing Fellows Program shall appoint staff to the
Commission.
(b) Membership. – The Commission shall consist of 14 members who shall be appointed
or serve as ex officio members as follows:
(1) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall appoint
four members to the Commission in even-numbered years as follows:
a. Two deans of schools of nursing at postsecondary constituent
institutions of The University of North Carolina.
b. The president of a North Carolina community college.
c. A nurse who graduated from a school of nursing located in the State
within three years of appointment to serve on the Commission.
(2) The General Assembly shall appoint two members to the Commission in
odd-numbered years in accordance with G.S. 120-121 as follows:
a. One dean of a school of nursing at a private postsecondary institution
operating in the State upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the
House of Representatives.
b. One dean of a school of nursing at a private postsecondary institution
operating in the State upon the recommendation of the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate.
(3) The Secretary of Health and Human Services shall appoint a representative of
the Office of Rural Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.
(4) The following seven members shall serve as ex officio members to the
Commission:
a. The chair of the Board of the State Education Assistance Authority, or
the chair's designee.
b. The Director of the North Carolina Nursing Fellows Program.
c. The President of the Winston-Salem State National Alumni
Association, or the President's designee.
d. The chair of the Board of Nursing, or the chair's designee.
e. The chair of the Board of Directors of the North Carolina Health Care
Facilities Association, or the chair's designee.
f. The Secretary of Health and Human Services, or his or her designee.
g. The State Treasurer in his or her capacity as Chair of the State Health
Plan, or a designee of the State Treasurer who represents the State
Health Plan.
Page 4 House Bill 957-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Terms of Office. – Appointments to the Commission shall be for two-year terms,
beginning July 1 and expiring June 30.
(d) Vacancies. – Except as otherwise provided, if a vacancy occurs in the membership of
the Commission, the appointing authority shall appoint another person meeting the same
qualifications to serve for the balance of the unexpired term.
(e) Chair; Meetings. – The Director of the Program shall call the first meeting of the
Commission. The Commission members shall elect a chair and a vice-chair from the membership
of the Commission to serve one-year terms. The Commission shall meet regularly at times and
places deemed necessary by the chair or, in the absence of the chair, by the vice-chair.
(f) Conflict of Interest. – A member of the Commission shall abstain from voting on the
selection of a postsecondary constituent institution of The University of North Carolina or a
private postsecondary institution operating in the State under G.S. 116-209.62(f) if the member
is an officer or employee of the institution or sits as a member of the institution's board of
directors.
(g) Expenses. – Commission members shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel
allowances in accordance with G.S. 138-5 or G.S. 138-6, as appropriate.
"§ 116-209.66. North Carolina Nursing Fellows Program established; administration.
(a) Program. – There is established the North Carolina Nursing Fellows Program to be
administered by the System Office of The University of North Carolina, in conjunction with the
Authority and the Commission. The purpose of the Program is to recruit, prepare, and support
students enrolled in eligible nursing programs for preparation as highly effective registered
nurses in the State. The Program shall be used to provide a forgivable loan to individuals
interested in preparing to become registered nurses in the State.
(b) Trust Fund. – There is established the North Carolina Nursing Fellows Program Trust
Fund to be administered by the Authority, in conjunction with the System Office of The
University of North Carolina. All funds (i) appropriated to, or otherwise received by, the Program
for forgivable loans and other Program purposes, (ii) received as repayment of forgivable loans,
and (iii) earned as interest on these funds shall be placed in the Trust Fund. The purpose of the
Trust Fund is to provide financial assistance to qualified students for completion of eligible
nursing programs to fill needed positions for registered nurses in the State.
(c) Uses of Monies in the Trust Fund. – The monies in the Trust Fund may be used only
for (i) forgivable loans granted under the Program, (ii) administrative costs associated with the
Program, including recruitment and recovery of funds advanced under the Program, (iii)
mentoring and coaching support to forgivable loan recipients, and (iv) extracurricular
enhancement activities of the Program in accordance with the following:
(1) The Authority shall transfer the greater of six hundred thousand dollars
($600,000) or ten percent (10%) of the available funds from the Trust Fund to
The University of North Carolina System Office at the beginning of each
fiscal year for the Program's administrative costs, the salary of the Director of
the Program and other Program staff, expenses of the Commission, and to
provide the Commission with funds to use for the extracurricular enhancement
activities of the Program.
(2) The Authority may use the greater of two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) or four percent (4%) of the funds appropriated to the Trust Fund
each fiscal year for administrative costs associated with the Program.
(3) The Authority shall provide the Commission with up to six hundred thousand
dollars ($600,000) from the Trust Fund in each fiscal year for the Commission
to provide mentoring and coaching support to forgivable loan recipients in an
amount of up to two thousand two hundred dollars ($2,200) for each Program
recipient.
House Bill 957-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) Director of the Program. – The Board of Governors of The University of North
Carolina shall appoint a Director of the Program. The Director shall appoint staff to the
Commission and shall be responsible for recruitment and coordination of the Program, including
proactive, aggressive, and strategic recruitment of potential recipients. Recruitment activities
shall include (i) targeting regions of the State with the highest nursing attrition rates and nurse
recruitment challenges, (ii) actively engaging with registered nurses, business leaders, experts in
human resources, elected officials, and other community leaders throughout the State, and (iii)
attracting candidates to the Program. The Director shall report to the President of The University
of North Carolina. The Authority shall provide office space and clerical support staff, as
necessary, to the Director for the Program.
(e) Student Selection Criteria for Forgivable Loans. – The Commission shall adopt
stringent standards for awarding forgivable loans based on multiple measures to ensure that only
the strongest applicants receive them, including the following:
(1) Grade point averages.
(2) Performance on relevant assessments.
(3) Experience, accomplishments, and other criteria demonstrating qualities
positively correlated with highly effective registered nurses, including
excellent verbal and communication skills.
(4) Demonstrated commitment to serve in North Carolina.
(f) Program Administration. – The Authority shall administer the Program in cooperation
with Winston-Salem State University.
(g) Awards of Forgivable Loans. – The Program shall provide forgivable loans to selected
students to be used at Winston-Salem State University for completion of an eligible nursing
program, as follows:
(1) North Carolina high school seniors. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per semester for up to eight semesters.
(2) Students applying for transfer to Winston-Salem State University. –
Forgivable loans of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per semester for up
to six semesters.
(3) Individuals currently holding a bachelor's degree seeking preparation to
become a registered nurse. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand dollars
($5,000) per semester for up to four semesters.
(4) Students matriculating at Winston-Salem State University who are changing
to a program of study leading to a bachelor of science in nursing at a selected
institution of higher education. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per semester for up to four semesters.
Forgivable loans may be used for tuition, fees, the cost of books, and expenses related to
obtaining licensure.
(h) Administration of Forgivable Loan Awards. – Upon the naming of recipients of the
forgivable loans by the Commission, the Commission shall transfer to the Authority its decisions.
The Authority, in coordination with the Director, shall perform all of the administrative functions
necessary to implement this Part, which functions shall include rulemaking, disseminating
information, acting as a liaison with participating institutions of higher education, implementing
forgivable loan agreements, loan monitoring, loan canceling through service and collection,
determining the acceptability of service repayment agreements, enforcing the agreements, and
all other functions necessary for the execution, payment, and enforcement of promissory notes
required under this Part.
(i) Annual Report. – The Commission, in coordination with the Authority, the North
Carolina Board of Nursing, and Winston-Salem State University, shall report no later than
January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee
regarding the following:
Page 6 House Bill 957-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Forgivable loans awarded from the Trust Fund, including the following:
a. Demographic information regarding recipients.
b. Number of recipients by institution of higher education.
(2) Placement and repayment rates, including the following:
a. Number of graduates who have been employed as a registered nurse
in the State within two years of graduation.
b. Number of graduates who have elected to do loan repayment and their
years of service, if any, prior to beginning loan repayment.
(3) Mentoring and coaching support, including the number of forgivable loan
recipients who received mentoring and coaching support.
(4) Selected nurse employer outcomes, including the following:
a. Turnover rate for forgivable loan graduates, including the turnover rate
for graduates who also received mentoring and coaching support.
b. Fulfillment rate of forgivable loan graduates.
"§ 116-209.67. Terms of forgivable loans; receipt and disbursement of funds.
(a) Notes. – All forgivable loans shall be evidenced by notes made payable to the
Authority that bear interest at a rate not to exceed ten percent (10%) per year as set by the
Authority and beginning on the first day of September after completion of the eligible nursing
program or 90 days after graduation, whichever is later. If a forgivable loan is terminated, the
note shall be made payable to the Authority 90 days after termination of the forgivable loan. The
forgivable loan may be terminated upon the recipient's withdrawal from the Program or by the
recipient's failure to meet the standards set by the Commission.
(b) Forgiveness. – For every year a qualifying nurse remains a qualifying nurse, the
Authority shall forgive the loan amount received over one year of enrollment in an eligible
nursing program and any interest accrued on that amount. The Authority shall also forgive the
loan if it finds that it is impossible for the recipient to work for up to eight years, within 10 years
after completion of the eligible nursing program, as a nurse in the State because of the death or
permanent disability of the recipient. If the recipient repays the forgivable loan by cash payments,
all indebtedness shall be repaid within 10 years after completion of the eligible nursing program
supported by the forgivable loan. If the recipient completes an eligible nursing program, payment
of principal and interest shall begin no later than the first day of September after the completion
of the program. Should a recipient present extenuating circumstances, the Authority may extend
the period to repay the loan in cash to no more than a total of 12 years."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 116-204 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-204. Powers of Authority.
The Authority is hereby authorized and empowered:
…
(9) To collect loan repayments for loans awarded under the Teaching Fellows
Program pursuant to G.S. 115C-363.23A following programs if the loan
repayment is outstanding for more than 30 days.days:
a. The Teaching Fellows Program pursuant to Part 3 of this Article.
b. The Nursing Fellows Program pursuant to Part 3A of this Article.
…."
SECTION 4.(c) Initial appointments to the North Carolina Nursing Fellows
Commission shall be made no later than August 15, 2026. Initial appointments to the Commission
shall expire July 1, 2028.
SECTION 4.(d) The Commission shall select recipients and award the initial
forgivable loans for the 2026-2027 academic year no later than April 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.(e) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of two
million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in recurring funds to be allocated to the State
House Bill 957-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Education Assistance Authority to develop and administer the Nursing Fellows Program
established in Part 3A of Article 23 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes, as enacted by this
section.
SECTION 4.(f) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning
with applications for enrollment in the Nursing Fellows Program in the 2026-2027 academic
year.

PART V. EXPAND CHEATHAM-WHITE SCHOLARSHIP AND INCLUDE
WINSTON-SALEM STATE UNIVERSITY
SECTION 5.(a) Article 35 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Article 35.
"Cheatham-White Scholarships.
"§ 116-290. Cheatham-White Scholarships; establishment and purpose; benefits.
(a) Scholarships Established; Purpose. – The Cheatham-White Scholarships are
established as a merit scholarship program at North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State
University University, Winston-Salem State University, and at North Carolina Central
University. The purpose of the scholarships is to provide an outstanding educational experience
for students who are exceptional scholars, versatile and well-rounded individuals with a broad
range of interests, and who are accomplished and proficient in areas of both the arts and the
sciences. They must also demonstrate leadership potential and a strong commitment to service.
…
(c) Number of Scholarships Awarded. – Up to 50 scholarships, 40 for resident students
and 10 for nonresident students, may be awarded each academic year to students admitted to
North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University. Up to 50 scholarships, 40 for
resident students and 10 for nonresident students, may be awarded each academic year to students
admitted to Winston-Salem State University. Up to 50 scholarships, 40 for resident students and
10 for nonresident students, may be awarded each academic year to students admitted to North
Carolina Central University.
…
"§ 116-292. Cheatham-White Scholarships; eligibility and selection criteria.
(a) Eligibility. – To be eligible to be nominated as a potential candidate for a
Cheatham-White Scholarship, a person must satisfy all of the following criteria:
(1) Be a competitive applicant for admission as a freshman in the fall semester
into a baccalaureate program at either North Carolina Agricultural and
Technical State University University, Winston-Salem State University, or
North Carolina Central University.
(2) Be a United States citizen or permanent resident.
(3) Be on course to graduate from high school in the spring semester prior to
college admission.
(b) Selection Criteria. – Candidates for Cheatham-White Scholarships shall be selected
on the basis of academic merit, honorable character, outstanding leadership potential, and a
demonstrable commitment to service. Financial need shall not be a consideration.
…
"§ 116-294. Cheatham-White Scholarships; administration of scholarships.
The University of North Carolina System Office shall administer the Cheatham-White
Scholarships, in consultation and collaboration with North Carolina Agricultural and Technical
State University University, Winston-Salem State University, and North Carolina Central
University, pursuant to policies adopted by the Board of Trustees of both constituent institutions.
each constituent institution. As part of its administrative responsibilities, The University of North
Carolina System Office, in consultation and collaboration with North Carolina Agricultural and
Page 8 House Bill 957-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Technical State University University, Winston-Salem State University, and North Carolina
Central University, shall do all of the following:
…."
SECTION 5.(b) There is appropriated from the Education Lottery Fund to the Board
of Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of three million one hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($3,150,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to add
Winston-Salem State University as a participating school in the Cheatham-White Scholarship
and expand opportunities for all students to receive the Cheatham-White Scholarship.

PART VI. FUNDS FOR ELIZABETH CITY STATE UNIVERSITY
SECTION 6. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the following sums in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026
fiscal year to be allocated to Elizabeth City State University:
(1) Sixty-six million dollars ($66,000,000) to expand the aviation science
program.
(2) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) to renovate the Roebuck Stadium.
(3) Forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) for a residence hall.

PART VII. FUNDS FOR JOHNSON C. SMITH UNIVERSITY
SECTION 7. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the following sums for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to
Johnson C. Smith University:
(1) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds as a directed grant for
capital improvements.
(2) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring funds to support academic
programs, including health professional preparedness programs.
(3) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds as a directed grant
for the following transformative initiatives:
a. To develop a consortium with other universities.
b. To support shared services and other resources across higher education
institutions.
c. To increase student retention, completion, and success with
wrap-around academic and non-academic support services.
d. To prioritize recruitment, retention, and graduation of
high-performing students through scholarships and internships.
e. To align aspects of the Charlotte Mayor's Racial Equity Initiative
(MREI) with a transformative University and Community framework
(West End) for Black Economic Development and Educational
Opportunities (BEDEO).

PART VIII. FUNDS FOR SHAW UNIVERSITY
SECTION 8. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the following sums for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to
Shaw University:
(1) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds as a directed grant for
capital improvements.
(2) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring funds to support the teacher
preparation program.

PART IX. FUNDS FOR BARBA-SCOTIA COLLEGE
House Bill 957-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the following sums for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to
Barba-Scotia College:
(1) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds as a directed grant for
capital improvements, including renovation of historical buildings on campus.
(2) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring funds for workforce
development initiatives.

PART X. FUNDS FOR NEED-BASED SCHOLARSHIPS FOR STUDENTS ATTENDING
PRIVATE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION
SECTION 10. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in
recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the State Education Assistance
Authority to increase need-based scholarships for students attending private institutions of higher
education in accordance with Article 34 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes.

PART XI. FUNDS FOR BENNETT COLLEGE
SECTION 11. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the following sums in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
to be allocated to Bennett College:
(1) The sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) as a directed grant for deferred
facility maintenance needs, including maintenance of residence halls.
(2) The sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to support
the education degree program at that private postsecondary institution.

PART XII. FUNDS FOR LIVINGSTONE COLLEGE
SECTION 12. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the following sums in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
to be allocated to Livingstone College:
(1) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) to support the college.
(2) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for the Livingstone College Center for
Aging Out to support students aging out of foster care.

PART XIII. FUNDS FOR SAINT AUGUSTINE'S UNIVERSITY
SECTION 13.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the following sums in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
to be allocated to Saint Augustine's University:
(1) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for a completion assistance grant program
to address gaps in degree completion rates for students.
(2) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for the construction of a new
academic building for collaborative learning and innovation.
SECTION 13.(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to annually appropriate a
portion of available funds in the Education Lottery Fund in G.S. 18C-164(a) to support
scholarships for needy students enrolled at Saint Augustine's University.

PART XIV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 14. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 10 House Bill 957-First Edition